Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1804
Department of Motor Vehicles; validation decal; furnish.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall design, procure, and furnish to the county treasurers a validation decal which may be attached to the camper unit as evidence that a permit has been obtained. Each county treasurer shall furnish a validation decal to the person obtaining the permit and such decal shall be attached to the camper unit so as to be clearly visible from the outside of the unit.

Laws 1969, c. 627, § 4, p. 2527;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 261.